Oklahoma, session 2026, SB670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 495a.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 495a.1. A. At regular intervals set by the State Board
of Medical Licensure and Supervision, no less than one time per
annum, each licensee licensed by the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act shall demonstrate to the
Board the licensee’s continuing qualification to practice medicine
and surgery. The licensee shall apply for license reregistration on
a form or forms provided by the Board, which shall be designed to
require the licensee to update or add to the information in the
Board’s file relating to the licensee and his or her professional
activity. It shall also require the licensee to report to the Board
the following information:
1. Any action taken against the licensee for acts or conduct
similar to acts or conduct described in the Oklahoma Allopathic
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Medi cal and Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act as grounds for
disciplinary action by:
a. any jurisdiction or authority (United States or
foreign) that licenses or authorizes the practice of
medicine and surgery,
b. any peer review body,
c. any health care institution,
d. any professional medical society or association,
e. any law enforcement agency,
f. any court, or
g. any governmental agency;
2. Any adverse judgment, settlement, or award against the
licensee arising from a professional liability claim;
3. The licensee’s voluntary surrender of or voluntary
limitation on any license or authorization to practice medicine and
surgery in any jurisdiction, including military, public health and
foreign;
4. Any denial to the licensee of a license or authorization to
practice medicine and surgery by any jurisdiction, including
military, public health or foreign;
5. The licensee’s voluntary resignation from the medical staff
of any health care institution or voluntary limitation of the
licensee’s staff privileges at such an institution if that action
occurred while the licensee was under formal or informal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inve stigation by the institution or a committee thereof for any
reason related to alleged medical incompetence, unprofessional
conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
6. The licensee’s voluntary resignation or withdrawal from a
national, state, or county medical society, association, or
organization if that action occurred while the licensee was under
formal or informal investigation or review by that body for any
reason related to possible medical incompetence, unprofessional or
unethical conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
7. Whether the licensee has abused or has been addicted to or
treated for addiction to alcohol or any chemical substance during
the previous registration period, unless such person is in a
rehabilitation program approved by the Board;
8. Whether the licensee has had any physical injury or disease
or mental illness during the previous registration period that
affected or interrupted his or her practice of medicine and surgery;
and
9. The licensee’s completion of continuing medical education or
other forms of professional maintenance or evaluation, including
specialty board certification or recertification, during the
previous registration period.
B. The Board may require continuing medical education for
license reregistration and require documentation of that education.
The Board shall promulgate rules on the specific requirements of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

amou nt of continuing medical education needed for reregistration.
Failure to meet the requirements in the allotted time may result in
the licensee being required to pay a nondisciplinary fine by the
Board secretary of up to but not more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00).
C. The Board shall require that the licensee receive not less
than one:
1. One (1) hour of education in pain management or one (1) hour
of education in opioid use or addiction each year preceding an
application for renewal of a license, unless the licensee has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Board that the licensee does
not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration
registration number; and
2. One (1) hour of education in integrated behavioral health
care.
D. The licensee shall sign and attest to the veracity of the
application form for license reregistration. Failure to report
fully and correctly shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the
Board.
E. The Board shall establish a system for reviewing
reregistration forms. The Board may initiate investigations and
disciplinary proceedings based on information submitted by licensees
for license reregistration.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. Upon a finding by the Board that the licensee is fit to
continue to practice medicine and surgery in this state, the Board
shall issue to the licensee a license to practice medicine and
surgery during the next registration period.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 510.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A physician shall provide an evidence-based, validated
mental health screening instrument as prescribed by the State Board
of Medical Licensure and Supervision to each patient during or
before a routine primary care visit.
B. The Board shall promulgate rules pertaining to the required
screening instrument and shall create such information and
educational materials necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. The Board may collaborate with the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners and the Oklahoma Board of Nursing to develop
such rules, information, and educational materials.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 519.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 519.8. A. Licenses issued to physician assistants
shall be renewed annually on a date determined by the State Board of
Medical Licensure and Supervision. Each application for renewal
shall document that the physician assistant has earned at least
twenty (20) hours of continuing medical education during the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prec eding calendar year. Such continuing medical education shall
include not less than one:
1. One (1) hour of education in pain management or one (1) hour
of education in opioid use or addiction; and
2. One (1) hour of education in integrated behavioral health
care.
B. The Board shall promulgate, in the manner established by its
rules, fees for the following:
1. Initial licensure;
2. License renewal;
3. Late license renewal; and
4. Disciplinary hearing.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 519.13 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A physician assistant shall provide an evidence-based,
validated mental health screening instrument as prescribed by the
State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision to each patient
during or before a routine primary care visit.
B. The Board shall promulgate rules pertaining to the required
screening instrument and shall create such information and
educational materials necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. The Board may collaborate with the State Board of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Oste opathic Examiners and the Oklahoma Board of Nursing to develop
such rules, information, and educational materials.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.5a, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 94, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 567.5a), is amended to read as follows:
Section 567.5a. A. All applicants for a license to practice as
an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall be subject to Section
567.8 of this title.
B. An applicant for an initial license to practice as an
Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall:
1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees
as established by the Board;
2. Submit a criminal history records check that complies with
Section 567.18 of this title;
3. Hold a current Registered Nurse license in this state;
4. Have completed an advanced practice registered nursing
education program in one of the four advanced practice registered
nurse roles and a specialty area recognized by the Board. Effective
January 1, 2016, the applicant shall have completed an accredited
graduate level advanced practice registered nursing education
program in at least one of the following population foci:
family/individual across the lifespan, adult-gerontology, neonatal,
pediatrics, women’s health/gender-related, or psychiatric/mental
health;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. Be currently certified in an advanced practice specialty
certification consistent with educational preparation and by a
national certifying body recognized by the Board; and
6. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board
in its rules.
C. The Board may issue a license by endorsement to an Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse licensed under the laws of another state
if the applicant meets the qualifications for licensure in this
state. An applicant by endorsement shall:
1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees
as established by the Board;
2. Submit a criminal history records check that complies with
Section 567.18 of this title;
3. Hold a current Registered Nurse license in this state;
4. Hold recognition as an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in
a state or territory;
5. Have completed an advanced practice registered nursing
education program in one of the four roles and a specialty area
recognized by the Board. Effective January 1, 2016, the applicant
shall have completed an accredited graduate level advanced practice
registered nursing education program in at least one of the
following population foci: family/individual across the lifespan,
adult-gerontology, neonatal, pediatrics, women’s health/gender-
related, or psychiatric/mental health;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Be currently certified in an advanced practice specialty
certification consistent with educational preparation and by a
national certifying body recognized by the Board;
7. Meet continued competency requirements as set forth in Board
rules; and
8. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board
in its rules.
D. The Board may issue prescriptive authority recognition by
endorsement to an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse licensed as an
APRN-CNP, APRN-CNS, or APRN-CNM under the laws of another state if
the applicant meets the requirements set forth in this section. An
applicant for prescriptive authority recognition by endorsement
shall:
1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees
as established by the Board;
2. Hold current Registered Nurse and Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse licenses (APRN-CNP, APRN-CNS, or APRN-CNM) in the
state;
3. Hold current licensure or recognition as an Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse in the same role and specialty with
prescribing privileges in another state or territory;
4. Submit documentation verifying successful completion of a
graduate level advanced practice registered nursing education
program that included an academic course in pharmacotherapeutic
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mana gement, and didactic and clinical preparation for prescribing
incorporated throughout the program;
5. Submit a written statement from an Oklahoma licensed
physician supervising prescriptive authority as required by the
Board in its rules;
6. Meet continued competency requirements as set forth in Board
rules; and
7. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board
in its rules.
E. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse license issued under
this section shall be renewed concurrently with the registered nurse
license provided that qualifying criteria continue to be met.
F. The Board may reinstate a license as set forth in Board
rules.
G. Continuing education requirements prescribed by the Board
for Advanced Practice Registered Nurses shall include not less than
one (1) hour of education in integrated behavioral health care.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 567.32 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall provide an
evidence-based, validated mental health screening instrument as
prescribed by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing to each patient during
or before a routine primary care visit.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. The Board shall promulgate rules pertaining to the required
screening instrument and shall create such information and
educational materials necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. The Board may collaborate with the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision and the State Board of Osteopathic
Examiners to develop such rules, information, and educational
materials.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 638.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An osteopathic physician shall provide an evidence-based,
validated mental health screening instrument as prescribed by the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners to each patient during or
before a routine primary care visit.
B. The Board shall promulgate rules pertaining to the required
screening instrument and shall create such information and
educational materials necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. The Board may collaborate with the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision and the Oklahoma Board of Nursing to
develop such rules, information, and educational materials.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 641, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 641. A. All persons legally licensed to practice
osteopathic medicine in this state, on or before the first day of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

July of each year, shall apply to the secretary-treasurer of the
Board, on forms furnished thereby, for a renewal certificate of
registration entitling such licensee to practice osteopathic
medicine and surgery in Oklahoma during the next ensuing fiscal
year.
B. Each application shall be accompanied by a renewal fee in an
amount sufficient to cover the cost and expense incurred by the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, for a renewal of the person’s
certificate to practice osteopathic medicine.
C. 1. In addition to the payment of the annual renewal fee
each licensee applying for a renewal of the certificate shall
furnish to the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners proof that the
person has attended at least two (2) days of the annual educational
program conducted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association, or its
equivalent, as determined by the Board, in the fiscal year preceding
the application for a renewal; provided, the Board may excuse the
failure of the licensee to attend the educational program in the
case of illness or other unavoidable casualty rendering it
impossible for the licensee to have attended the educational program
or its equivalent.
2. The Board shall require that the licensee receive not less
than:
a. one (1) hour of education in pain management or one
(1) hour of education in opioid use or addiction each
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

year preceding an application for renewal of a
license, unless the licensee has demonstrated to the
satisfaction of the Board that the licensee does not
currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement
Administration registration number, and
b. one (1) hour of education in integrated behavioral
health care.
Such education may be held at the annual educational program
referenced in paragraph 1 of this subsection.
D. The secretary of the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
shall send a written notice to every person holding a legal
certificate to practice osteopathic medicine in this state, at least
thirty (30) days prior to the first day of July each year, directed
to the last-known address of the licensee, notifying the licensee
that it will be necessary for the licensee to pay the renewal
license fee as herein provided, and proper forms shall accompany the
notice upon which the licensee shall make application for renewal of
the certificate.
SECTION 9. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
March 3, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB670 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)